src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective   !!= * **@CODE@** is the main lexicon
ájdna:ájdna A_AAJDNA "only, only one" ; ! no. 21
mådde:mådde A_AAJDNA "several" ; ! no. 1196
bahá:bahá A_AALLKE "evil" ; ! no. 101
hávvske:hávvske A_AALLKE "pleasant, fun" ; ! no. 827
mihá:mihá A_AALLKE "proud" ; ! no. 1163
fuovas:fu^Ovvas A_AARVAS "numerous" ; ! no. 90334
luovas:lu^Ovvas A_AARVAS "loose; free" ; ! no. 1071
spájtas:spájjtas A_AARVAS "fast" ; ! no. 5141
ájnas:ájdnas A_AMAS "urgent, pressing" ; ! no. 3103
dávnas:dávdnas A_AMAS "particularly soft (for skis)" ; ! no. 343
gávkas:gávvkas A_AMAS "slow, boring" ; ! no. 578
suohtas:su^Ohttas A_AMAS "fun" ; ! no. 4525
durrulis:durrul A_ASEDIS "belligerent" ; ! no. 3455
suddogis:suddog A_ASEDIS "sinful" ; ! no. 6070
unogis:unog A_ASEDIS "strange, unusual, odd" ; ! no. 2033
báhkas:báhkka A_BAAHKAS "warm, hot" ; ! no. 105
garras:gar'ra A_BAAHKAS "hard" ; ! no. 90186
lieggas:liegga A_BAAHKAS "warm" ; ! no. 90122
bånndá:bånndá A_BAONNDAA "rich, wealthy" ; ! no. 246
båjjtot:båjjto A_BAOSSTOT "wrong, incorrect" ; ! no. 90533
båjjtot+Use/NG:båssto A_BAOSSTOT "wrong, incorrect" ; ! no. 90560
bivval:bivval A_BIVVAL "warm" ; ! no. 192
bulitj:bulitj A_BIVVAL "flammable, combustible" ; ! no. 3981
mårret:mårred2 A_BIVVAL "pleasant" ; ! no. 5506
jallgat:jallg A_BLAAVVAT "even, level, flat" ; ! no. 919
sjävdnjet+Use/NG:sjä2vdnj A_BLAAVVAT "dark" ; ! no. 91119
tjáhppat:tjáhpp A_BLAAVVAT "black" ; ! no. 1860
vällgat:vällg A_BLAAVVAT "white" ; ! no. 2118
gähppe:giehppe A_BUOSSJE "light, lightweight" ; ! no. 782
hådje:hådje A_BUOSSJE "sad, mournful" ; ! no. 90550
vájjve:vájjve A_BUOSSJE "difficult, troublesome, serious" ; ! no. 2067
dievas:dievva A_DIMES "full" ; ! no. 2628
dimes:dibme A_DIMES "soft" ; ! no. 374
duolvas:du^Ollva A_DIMES "dirty, impure" ; ! no. 400
duallbat:du^Ollba A_DUALLBAT "flat" ; ! no. 5578
därbulatj:dä2rbulatj A_ELULATJ "required, needed" ; ! no. 3242
gålbmåtjiegak:gålbmå#tjiegag2 A_ELULATJ "triangular" ; ! no. 4892
tjiegak:tjiegag2 A_ELULATJ "angular, cornered" ; ! no. 5212
dámak:dámag2 A_FIEROK "tame" ; ! no. 90987
gávak:gávag2 A_FIEROK "bent" ; ! no. 4816
mällgat:mä2llgad2 A_FIEROK "far" ; ! no. 1224
tjielgas:tjiellga A_GALMAS "clear and distinct" ; ! no. 4582
årås+Use/NG:ådå A_GALMAS "new" ; ! no. 90519
årås:årrå A_GALMAS "new" ; ! no. 90201
hieves:hievve A_GIENES "proud, impressive" ; ! no. 840
såmes:såbme A_GIENES "some" ; ! no. 1822
vijses:vijjse A_GIENES "smart, wise" ; ! no. 5224
gåjkes:gåjjke A_GÅJKES "dry" ; ! no. 6239
gassak:gassa A_IEDNAK "thick, fat" ; ! no. 562
iednak:iedna A_IEDNAK "a lot, much" ; ! no. 2395
stuorak:stu^Ora A_IEDNAK "big" ; ! no. 1739
ietjá:iehtjá A_IETJAA "other" ; ! no. 6882
jårrbåt:jårrb A_JAORRBAOT "round" ; ! no. 4921
låssåt:lås's A_JAORRBAOT "heavy, difficult" ; ! no. 1097
nágan+Use/NG:nagan A_NAGAN "some (-thing, -one)" ; ! no. 90963
nágan:nágan A_NAGAN "some (-thing, -one)" ; ! no. 3430
nágan+Use/NG:nagi2n A_NAGAN "some (-thing, -one)" ; ! no. 90807
buorre:bu^Orre A_NUORRA "good" ; ! no. 213
dummpi:dummpi A_NUORRA "stupid, dumb" ; ! no. 2383
nuorra:nu^Orra A_NUORRA "young" ; ! no. 1323
njállge:njállg A_SMAAVVE "tasty, delicious" ; ! no. 2323
smávve:smávv A_SMAAVVE "small, little" ; ! no. 90347
stuores:stu^Orr A_STUORES "big" ; ! no. 1742
stuorra+Use/NG:stu^Or A_STUORx "big" ; ! no. 90796
tjábbe:tjább A_TJAABBE "beautiful" ; ! no. 1849
buäjjde:bu^Ojjde A_TJAEHPPE "fat" ; ! no. 90797
gallje:gallje A_TJAEHPPE "wide, spacious" ; ! no. 3783
vasste:vasste A_TJAEHPPE "ugly, horrible" ; ! no. 2337
dåbdos:dåbbdos A_TJAOSKES "known" ; ! no. 411
gárves:gárrves A_TJAOSKES "finished, ready" ; ! no. 5826
tjåskes:tjåsskes A_TJAOSKES "cold (for weather)" ; ! no. 1978
unne:un'n A_UNNE "small, little" ; ! no. 90285
guoros:gu^Orros A_VUOJNOS "empty" ; ! no. 4862
tjiegos:tjiehkos A_VUOJNOS "hidden, secret, confidential" ; ! no. 90984
vuojnos:vu^Ojdnos A_VUOJNOS "visible, obvious" ; ! no. 90398
fámodibme:fámod A_xDIBME "powerless" ; ! no. 5200
skábmodibme:skábmod A_xDIBME "unabashed" ; ! no. 5775
vuorbedibme:vuorbed A_xDIBME "unlucky" ; ! no. 5291
ådne:ådne A_ÅNEGIS "short" ; ! no. 2235
